src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_JEEʹEL !!= * @CODE@ jeeʹel:jeäkˈkel
! gradation: yes
!    Penultimate: Yes
!      Extra strong grade: Else
!      Weak grade: Sg.Nom, Sg.Gen, Sg.Acc, Pl.Nom
!    Ultimate: None
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
! Ultimate stem consonant
!! ** Yaml: __N-jeeel __ 
:%^Pen%^PALE%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^KKK2ZERO ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; !!= * @CODE@ jeeʹel
:%^Pen%^PALE%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^KKK2ZERO SG-NOM ;
!+Use/NG:%^Pen%^PALE%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^KKK2GG ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;  jeeʹjjel
!+Use/NG:%^Pen%^PALE%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^KKK2GG SG-NOM ;
:%^PenVow2a SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:%^RmVow%>a SG-ILL ;
:%^RmVow%>e SG-LOC ;
:%^RmVow SG-COM_IN ;
:%^RmVow%>e ESS/PAR ; ! ess and prt without
:%^PenVow2a PL-NOM ;
:%^RmVow PL-OBL ;
:%^Pen%^PALE%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^KKK2GG%^RmVow VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-

LEXICON N_NÂÂʹER !!= * @CODE@ nââʹer:n%^1VOWâkker
+N: NMN_NÂÂʹER ;
LEXICON NMN_NÂÂʹER !!= * @CODE@ nââʹer:n%^1VOWâkker
! gradation: yes
!    Penultimate: Yes
!      Extra strong grade: Else
!      Weak grade: Sg.Nom, Sg.Gen, Sg.Acc, Pl.Nom
!    Ultimate: None
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
! Ultimate stem consonant
!! ** Yaml: __N-naaer __ 
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^KK2ZERO ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; !!= * @CODE@ nââʹer
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^KK2ZERO SG-NOM ;
:%^PenVow2a SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:%^RmVow%>a SG-ILL ;
:%^RmVow%>e SG-LOC ;
:%^RmVow SG-COM_IN ;
:%^RmVow%>e ESS/PAR ; ! ess and prt without
:%^PenVow2a PL-NOM ;
:%^RmVow PL-OBL ;
:%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^KK2GG%^RmVow VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-

!! !!s:z-stem type
LEXICON N_MAINSTUMMUŠ
+N+Err/Orth:%^Pen%^CC2C ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! mainstumuš
+N+Err/Orth:%^Pen%^CC2C SG-NOM ;
+N+Err/Orth:%^Pen%^CC2C%>â ESS/PAR ;
+N+Err/Orth:%^Pen%^CC2C NMN_OBL-TÄÄVTÕS ; ! checkme
!%^V2VV%^KK2GG

+N: NMN_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
LEXICON NMN_MAINSTUMMUŠ
!! ** Yaml: __kerres __
 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 SG-NOM ;
:%^VC SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:%^RmVow%>a SG-ILL ;
:%^RmVow%>e SG-LOC ;
:%^RmVow SG-COM_IN ;
:%^RmVow%>e ESS/PAR ;
:%^VC PL-NOM ;
:%^RmVow PL-OBL ;
:%^RmVow VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-


!! CLASS 4 BISYLLABIC, LOW VOWEL, DIPHTHONG, PALATALIZATION
!! IN PENULTIMATE E:0

LEXICON N_KÄÄʹLLES !!= * @CODE@ kääʹlles:källez
+N: NMN_KÄÄʹLLES ;
LEXICON NMN_KÄÄʹLLES !!= * @CODE@ kääʹlles:källez
! 3.e.diphth.gem
! gradation: yes
!   Extra strong grade: Else
!   Weak grade: Sg.Nom
! Diphthong
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
!! ** Yaml: __N-kaeaelles__
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^PAL%^DeVC ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! kääʹlles
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^PAL%^DeVC SG-NOM ;	     	! kääʹlles
:%^PenVow2a SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;	 		! källaz
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>a SG-ILL ;	  			! källsa
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e SG-LOC ;				! källsest
:%^RmVow%^DeVC SG-COM_IN ;				! källsin
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e ESS/PAR ;  				! källsen
:%^RmVow%^DeVC PL-OBL ;					! källsi
:%^RmVow%^DeVC VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ källs-

LEXICON N_ÅÅʹVES !!= * @CODE@ ååʹves:åvvez
+N: NMN_ÅÅʹVES ;
LEXICON NMN_ÅÅʹVES !!= * @CODE@ ååʹves:åvvez
! 3.e.diphth.gem
! gradation: yes
!   Extra strong grade: Else
!   Weak grade: Sg.Nom
! Diphthong
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
!! ** Yaml: __N-aaves__
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^CC2C%^DeVC ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! ååʹves
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^CC2C%^DeVC SG-NOM ;	     	! ååʹves
:%^PenVow2a SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;	 		! åvvaz
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>a SG-ILL ;	  			! åvvsa
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e SG-LOC ;				! åvvsest
:%^RmVow%^DeVC SG-COM_IN ;				! åvvsin
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e ESS/PAR ;  				! åvvsen
:%^RmVow%^DeVC PL-OBL ;					! åvvsi
:%^RmVow%^DeVC VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ åvvs-

LEXICON N_KÄÄʹRBES !!= * @CODE@ kääʹrbes:kärbbez
+N: NMN_KÄÄʹRBES ;
LEXICON NMN_KÄÄʹRBES !!= * @CODE@ kääʹrbes:kärbbez
! 3.e.diphth.gem
! gradation: yes
!   Extra strong grade: Else
!   Weak grade: Sg.Nom
! Diphthong
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
!! ** Yaml: __N-kaeaerbes__
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^XYY2XY%^DeVC ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! kääʹrbes
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^XYY2XY%^DeVC SG-NOM ;	     	! kääʹrbes
:%^PenVow2a SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	 		! kärbbaz
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>a SG-ILL ;	  			! kärbbsa
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e SG-LOC ;				! kärbbsest
:%^RmVow%^DeVC SG-COM_IN ;				! kärbbsin
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e ESS/PAR ;  				! kärbbsen
:%^PenVow2a PL-NOM ;	 		! kärbbaz
:%^RmVow%^DeVC PL-OBL ;					! kärbbsi
:%^RmVow%^DeVC VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ kärbbs-

LEXICON N_PUÄʹRES !!= * @CODE@ puäʹres:puärˈrez
+N: NMN_PUÄʹRES ;
LEXICON NMN_PUÄʹRES !!= * @CODE@ puäʹres:puärˈrez
! 3.e.diphth.gem
! gradation: yes
!   Extra strong grade: Else
!   Weak grade: Sg.Nom
! Diphthong
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
!! ** Yaml: __N-puaeres__
:%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^CCC2C%^DeVC ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! puäʹres
:%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^CCC2C%^DeVC SG-NOM ;	     	! puäʹres
:%^PenVow2a SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;	 		! puärˈraz
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>a SG-ILL ;	  			! puärˈrsa
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e SG-LOC ;				! puärˈrsest
:%^RmVow%^DeVC SG-COM_IN ;				! puärˈrsin
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e ESS/PAR ;  				! puärˈrsen
:%^RmVow%^DeVC PL-OBL ;					! puärˈrsi
:%^RmVow%^DeVC VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ puärˈrs-

!! !!l-stems
LEXICON N_NJUÄʹMMEL !!= * @CODE@ = stemtype l-stem njuäʹmmel:njuäʹmmel
!! ** Yaml: __njuammel, njuunnjel, aappal__ 
+N: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
+N: SG-NOM ;
+N:%^VOWSH%^CLong  SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;
+N:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^RmVow%>a SG-ILL ;
+N:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^RmVow%>e SG-LOC ;
+N:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^RmVow%> SG-COM_IN ;
+N:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^RmVow%>e ESS/PAR ; ! ess and prt without
+N:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^RmVow PL-OBL ;


LEXICON N_CIẸʹǨǨES !!= * @CODE@ cieʹǩǩes:ceâkˈkez
+N: NMN_CIẸʹǨǨES ;
LEXICON NMN_CIẸʹǨǨES
! cieʹǩǩes:ciâkˈkez
! gradation: yes
!    Penultimate: Yes
!      Extra strong grade: Else
!      Weak grade: Sg.Nom, Sg.Gen, Sg.Acc, Pl.Nom
!    Ultimate: None
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
!! * __@LEXNAME@__ = Koulukielioppi stemtype II 9 (29)
!! ** Yaml: __N-ciekkes __ 
+N:%^Pen%^PALẸ%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^CCC2CC%^DeVC ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
+N:%^Pen%^PALẸ%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^CCC2CC%^DeVC SG-NOM ;
+N:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^PenVow2a SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
+N:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^RmVow%^DeVC%>a SG-ILL ;
+N:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e SG-LOC ;
+N:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^RmVow%^DeVC SG-COM_IN ;
+N:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e ESS/PAR ;
+N:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^PenVow2a PL-NOM ;
+N:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^RmVow%^DeVC PL-OBL ;
+N:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^RmVow%^DeVC VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-

LEXICON N_ČUEʹĐES !!= * @CODE@ čueʹđes:čuâttez
+N: NMN_ČUEʹĐES ;
LEXICON NMN_ČUEʹĐES !!= * @CODE@ čueʹđes:čuâttez
! 3.e.diphth.gem
! gradation: yes
!   Extra strong grade: Else
!   Weak grade: Sg.Nom
! Diphthong
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
!! ** Yaml: __N-chuedhes__
:%^Pen%^PALE%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^CC2C%^DeVC ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! čueʹđes
:%^Pen%^PALE%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^CC2C%^DeVC SG-NOM ;	     	! čueʹđes
:%^PenVow2a SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	 		! čuâttaz
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>a SG-ILL ;	  			! čuâttsa
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e SG-LOC ;				! čuâttsest
:%^RmVow%^DeVC SG-COM_IN ;				! čuâttsin
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e ESS/PAR ;  				! čuâttsen
:%^PenVow2a PL-NOM ;	 		! čuâttaz
:%^RmVow%^DeVC PL-OBL ;					! čuâttsi
:%^RmVow%^DeVC VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-

LEXICON N_ǨEEʹLES !!= * @CODE@ ǩeeʹles:ǩeâlˈlez
+N: NMN_ǨEEʹLES ;
