src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-INCOMING
tieʹttikääʹlles:tieʹtti%^1VOW#käll N_KÄÄʹLLES ;
Riʹmjj-kääʹlles:Riʹmjj-#kä%^1VOWllez N_KÄÄʹLLES ;
auʹrrjummuš:auʹrrjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
cerctummuš:cerctummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
cuäʹlǩstummuš:cuäʹlǩstummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
ehdtummuš:ehdtummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
gååradnjuäʹmmel:gåårad#njuäʹmˈmel N_NJUÄʹMMEL ;
herkkšummuš:herkkšummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
hoiʹddjummuš:hoiʹddjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
hâârptummuš:hâârptummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
häʹrvvummuš:häʹrvvummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
iđđlummuš:iđđlummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
jiâlčummuš:jiâlčummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
joukktaʹrǩǩummuš:joukktaʹrǩǩummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
jättâʹttummuš:jättâʹttummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
kaaupšummuš:kaaupšummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
kaʹđđjummuš:kaʹđđjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
kooʒʒstummuš:kooʒʒstummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
kruuʹnʼjummuš:kruuʹnʼjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
kuâbbummuš:kuâbbummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
kuäkkšummuš:kuäkkšummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
kuäšǩummuš:kuäšǩummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
kuõzztummuš:kuõzztummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
kââmtummuš:kââmtummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
kâʹpttpââʹldes:kâʹptt#pâ%^1VOWlddez N_KÄÄʹRBES ;
kääiǥummuš:kääiǥummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
kåmmnummuš:kåmmnummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
kõskkcieʹǩǩes:kõskk#ciâkˈkez N_CIẸʹǨǨES ;
kõskkstummuš:kõskkstummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
laiʹddjummuš:laiʹddjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
leuʹddjummuš:leuʹddjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
liiđummuš:liiđummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
liʹšǩǩummuš:liʹšǩǩummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
lueʹǯǯjummuš:lueʹǯǯjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
lââppummuš:lââppummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
låggsummuš:låggsummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
lååʹddkääʹlles:lååʹdd#kä%^1VOWllez N_KÄÄʹLLES ;
messnummuš:messnummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
miõckknummuš:miõckknummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
miõsträäʹstes:miõsträ%^1VOWsttez N_KÄÄʹRBES ;
mottjummuš:mottjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
muʹrddummuš:muʹrddummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
mäʹhssemǩeäppummuš:mäʹhssemǩeäppummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
neälggummuš:neälggummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
njeâʒkstummuš:njeâʒkstummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
njuäcktummuš:njuäcktummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
njââlʼjummuš:njââlʼjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
njääʹljes:njä%^1VOWlggez N_KÄÄʹRBES ;
notkklummuš:notkklummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
näđđjummuš:näđđjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
ooccšummuš:ooccšummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
ođđkääʹlles:ođđ#kä%^1VOWllez N_KÄÄʹLLES ;
paakkummuš:paakkummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
paʹrttummuš:paʹrttummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
peâltummuš:peâltummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
peʹlljrääʹstes:peʹlljrä%^1VOWsttez N_KÄÄʹRBES ;
piijjlummuš:piijjlummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
piõđʹjtummuš:piõđʹjtummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
porggjummuš:porggjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
pråppummuš:pråppummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
puõʹcǩǩummuš:puõʹcǩǩummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
pâʹrǧǧummuš:pâʹrǧǧummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
päʹšttjummuš:päʹšttjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
põõʹlâʹttummuš:põõʹlâʹttummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
raʹvvjummuš:raʹvvjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
reddååʹves:redd#å%^1VOWvvez N_ÅÅʹVES ;
reäʹbccjummuš:reäʹbccjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
roʹttjummuš:roʹttjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
ruõčkktummuš:ruõčkktummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
ruõʹpssesjeäʹrtträäʹstes:ruõʹpssesjeäʹrtträ%^1VOWsttez N_KÄÄʹRBES ;
ruõʹpssesrääʹstes:ruõʹpsses#rä%^1VOWsttez N_KÄÄʹRBES ;
ruʹčǩǩesnjuäʹmmel:ruʹčǩǩes#njuäʹmmel N_NJUÄʹMMEL ;
rätkkjummuš:rätkkjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
rääʹnesrääʹstes:rääʹnes#rä%^1VOWsttez N_KÄÄʹRBES ;
rõõpptummuš:rõõpptummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
seeʹrdtummuš:seeʹrdtummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
siirtummuš:siirtummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
skuurummuš:skuurummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
soʹddjummuš:soʹddjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
staunnkääʹrbes:staunn#kä%^1VOWrbbez N_KÄÄʹRBES ;
sueʹlummuš:sueʹlummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
suõjjlummuš:suõjjlummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
säärnummuš:säärnummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
sääʹlves:sä%^1VOWlvvez N_KÄÄʹRBES ;
sääʹmååʹves:sääʹm#å%^1VOWvvez N_ÅÅʹVES ;
taajšummuš:taajšummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
teälččlummuš:teälččlummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
toolčtummuš:toolčtummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
tuåimmjummuš:tuåimmjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
täʹhttläppjummuš:täʹhttläppjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
vaajtummuš:vaajtummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
veârtobdstummuš:veârtobdstummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
vipššummuš:vipššummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
vuârskummuš:vuârskummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
vuõkksummuš:vuõkksummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
väʹlddjummuš:väʹlddjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
ärvvtõõllâmõõlǥtummuš:ärvvtõõllâmõõlǥtummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
õõutoummuvuäʹmstummuš:õõutoummuvuäʹmstummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
čaʹppesrääʹstes:čaʹppes#rä%^1VOWsttez N_KÄÄʹRBES ;
čoođummuš:čoođummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
čueʹpčes:čuä%^1VOWpččez N_KÄÄʹRBES ;
čuõʹjjtummuš:čuõʹjjtummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
škornnummuš:škornnummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
šäurrväʹlddummuš:šäurrväʹlddummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
ǩeärummuš:ǩeärummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
ǩiõbrnjummuš:ǩiõbrnjummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
ǩiʹrddiååʹves:ǩiʹrddi#å%^1VOWvvez N_ÅÅʹVES ;
